Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2109
Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards; functional classification; criteria; adoption; hearing; duties.

The Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards shall develop and adopt the specific criteria for each functional classification set forth in sections 39-2103 and 39-2104, which criteria shall be consistent with the general criteria set forth in those sections. No such criteria shall be adopted until after public hearings have been held thereon at such times and places as to assure interested parties throughout the state an opportunity to be heard thereon. Following their adoption, the board shall provide an electronic copy of such criteria to the Secretary of State and the Clerk of the Legislature. The board shall also provide an electronic notification of such criteria to the appropriate representative of each county and each incorporated municipality and to the Director-State Engineer.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 9, p. 1123;

Laws 1980, LB 873, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 10, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB1068, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB82, § 4.